Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 2376 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb S.F. 2376 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 572A.1 Contractor performance bond 1 ââ registration requirement. 2 1. A general contractor or subcontractor that engages in 3 the business of construction in this state shall obtain and 4 maintain an annual performance bond or irrevocable letter of 5 credit in the amount of fifty thousand dollars. The bond 6 or letter of credit shall be payable to the state of Iowa 7 and executed by a surety company or financial institution 8 authorized to do business in this state. 9 2. A bond or letter of credit required pursuant to 10 this section shall be filed with the state. The state or a 11 political subdivision of the state may enforce the requirements 12 of this section in connection with private construction work 13 within its jurisdiction and may bring an action on the bond or 14 letter of credit in the name of the state of Iowa for the use 15 and benefit of a private person or political subdivision harmed 16 by the contractorâs or subcontractorâs failure to perform 17 contractual obligations or for violation of this section or 18 other applicable law. 19 3. The aggregate liability of a surety company or financial 20 institution under a bond or letter of credit issued pursuant to 21 this section shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond or the 22 face amount of the letter of credit, regardless of the number 23 of claims made or actions brought. 24 4. A general contractor or subcontractor shall not 25 register, renew a registration, or conduct business as a 26 general contractor or subcontractor in this state unless the 27 general contractor or subcontractor has a bond or letter of 28 credit as required by this section. 29 5. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a political 30 subdivision of the state shall not, in connection with 31 private construction work, require a general contractor or 32 subcontractor to obtain or file a bond, letter of credit, or 33 other financial security, or require the issuance of a license 34 or impose a license fee or charge, except as expressly required 35 -1- SF 2376 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2376 by this section or by other state or federal law. 1 b. A political subdivision of the state may require a 2 contractor or subcontractor to obtain or file a bond, letter of 3 credit, or other financial security for private construction 4 work that is performed in a public right-of-way. 5 6. This section does not apply to a general contractor or 6 subcontractor performing work for the state or a political 7 subdivision of the state, including work subject to the 8 requirements of chapter 8A, subchapter III. 9 7. For purposes of this section: 10 a. âConstructionâ means the improvement of real property, 11 including the performance of labor or furnishing of materials 12 for the alteration, repair, or erection of a building or 13 structure. 14 b. âGeneral contractorâ means the same as defined in section 15 572.1. 16 c. âSubcontractorâ means the same as defined in section 17 572.l. 18 -2- SF 2376 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb 2/ 2